District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.09

Rights of certain boards preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit the Board of Education, the Board of Library Trustees, or the Board of Trustees of the University of the District of Columbia from naming or renaming the public buildings or spaces under their respective jurisdictions.

History

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 409, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-459.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 4-201, § 410, concerning the naming of sponsored recreation facilities, see § 2(b) of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-201, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15274).